Louisiana, session 2026, HB1002.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.27 (I) through (K) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2800.27. Recoverable past medical expenses; collateral sources; limitations;
evidence
* * *
I.(1) If a claimant obtains medical treatment under a letter of protection or
does not submit charges to a health insurance issuer for medical treatment, the
evidence shall be limited to the amount the claimant's health insurance issuer would
have paid the healthcare provider to satisfy the past unpaid medical charges, plus the
claimant's share of medical expenses, had the claimant obtained medical treatment
under the claimant's health insurance coverage.
(2) If the claimant obtains medical treatment or services under a letter of
protection and the healthcare provider subsequently transfers the right to receive
payment under the letter of protection to a third party, the claimant's recovery shall
be limited to the amount the third party agreed to pay and evidence shall be limited
to the amount paid.
J.(1) A claimant shall make reasonable efforts to mitigate damages and the
recovery of medical expenses shall be limited to the reasonable expenses related to
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1411 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1002
the claim. At trial, any party may introduce expert testimony to establish or refute
the reasonableness of medical expenses sought to be recovered by the claimant.
(2) All charges for the claimant's medical and healthcare expenses shall be
itemized and coded according to generally accepted medical billing practices to the
extent applicable.
K. Nothing in this Section limits the right of a claimant or defendant to
present evidence or testimony challenging the reasonableness of medical and
healthcare expenses, whether incurred or projected future expenses, or the medical
necessity of any treatment.